src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
apsvilino/PSX
a aroti/NSTXadefijklmopqruvx
baigin ti/STXdefjkl
bald /NPSXYdpqsvx
bandyti/NSTXdfprv
barningas/ANQ
barstin ti/NTXd
barstyti/NSTXacdefhjlmnopqrtvx
barsto/ENSXacdefhjlmnopqrtvx
beld ia/ENSXdfjklnopqrsvwx
berg d ia/ENSXabcdef
berti/NSTXbcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
betonavo/NPXdl
bildino/NPXdefgkl
bindzino/NPXcdegil
birzgino/NPXd
bitininkauti/NSTXdfinqrtv
bliaukia/ENXdk
blyk ta/ENXabcdefhjk
bly kina/ENXdf
blokuoti/NSTXbklnwx
blo kia/ENSXabcdefghijklmnpqvx
boginti/NTXcdeg
bosta/ENXfnq
braidyti/NSTXabdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
braido/ENSXabdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
brai o/ENSXacdefhjknopqrstvwx
braukti/NSTXacdefghijklmnopqrvwx
brenda/ENXabcdefghijklqu
br  ti/NTXabcdefhlmoqrtx
br k niuoti/NTXefjklwx
budinti/DNTXefijk
b go/NPXcfk
burbia/ENXejk
buria/ENSXbdefjklpw
buriuoja/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvx
b ti/NSTUXbcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
ceremonyti/STX
dailinti/NSTXacdefhklmnpqrtvw
dainuoja/ENSXabcdefghijkloqruvwx
dairo/ESXmr
dalino/NPSXabdfhjkmnpr
dangina/ESXdeghiklpqstuwx
dangstyti/NSTXaefjlmvx
dar /NSXYabcdefhijklmnpqrtuvwx
darin jo/NPXbcdehjklnpx
dau yti/NSTXabdefijklmnopqruvwx
dav /NPSXabcdefghjklnopqrstwx
davin jo/NPSXabcdfghijlnoprstuvx
dejavo/NPXadefijkopv
d m jo/NPSXkow
deng /NPSXabdefghijlmnqrtuvx
dengia/ENSXabdefghijlmnqrtuvx
derina/ESXdefhjkopqrtuvw
dervuoja/ENXce
d st /NXYdejkpw
d v jo/NPSXacdefgikmpqsuvw
dildo/ENXadefhikmpqrtw
dimbina/ENXe
dirbo/NPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
dirbti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
dyksta/ENXadfhi
doroti/NSTXabefkmnrw
draskyti/NSTXacdefijkmopqrtuvw
dribti/NTXacdegklpx
drimba/DENXacdegklpx
drungino/NPX
drungti/NTXafk
dubti/NTXcdk
d myja/ESXacdegijklmnopqrstuvwx
d myjo/SXYacdegijklmnopqrstuvwx
d myti/NSTXacdefgijklmnopqrstuvwx
dundina/ENXdefgkl
duoti/NSTXabcdefghijklnopqrstwx
d iauna/ENSXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
d iauti/NSTXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
d iov /NPSXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
d i gauti/NSTXfinrv
eina/ENSXabcdefghijklmnoqrvwx
eiti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnoqrvwx
eksperimentavo/NPXfv
erzina/ESXcfjkorvw
filmavo/NPSXdefhjnqv
filmuoti/NSTXdefhjnqv
formuluoja/ENXhkw
gabena/ENSXbcdeghjklnopqstvwx
gaivina/ENSXbn
gano/ENXdij
garbinti/NSTXcdefhjklorvw
g sdinti/NSTXcdefhjlop
g sti/NTXmpqt
gaubti/NSTXacdeklmopqwx
gelton iedis/BN
geni/ENXdefj
g r /NPSXacdefhijklnoqrtuvwx
gesti/NTXacdefhjklrvw
gin ija/ESXefhprtuvw
ginti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnoprvx
girdi/ENSXjr
girg da/DENXbdefgiko
gydo/ENPSXabdefijklmpqrx
gleiv ti/NTXaj
gliaudo/ENXdf
glostyti/NSTXadefhijklmnpruvwx
gl dinti/NTXce
gnyb /NPXdhjk
grando/ENXadfjk
graudenti/STX
grau ti/NSTXabcdefhijklopqtuwx
gr   /PSXbdemnpq
griebia/ENSXbcdefjklnopqrvwx
grie ti/NTXcdefk
grybauja/ENXefjnqrtv
grubti/NTXabefk
gr do/NPSXbcdefhjklnopqstuvwx
gr sti/NSTXbcdefhjklnopqstuvwx
gujo/NPXbdel
gunksojo/NPX
guod /NPSXefprv
gv ra/ENXdfk
ie ko/ENXadfhkr
ilgo/NPXfipr
ima/ENSXabcdefhijklmnpqrtuvwx
iria/ESXbcdefhjnopqrtv
i sibr  kavo/PSX
i tobulinti/NTX
jojo/NPSXabcdefghijkl
jung /DNPSXabcdfhjkmnoprtvw
juokia/ESXadfmnpqrvw
kabina/DENSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
kabin jo/NPSXabdehjklmnpqvwx
kaisti/NTXabcdefhjklrvx
kalba/DESXabcdefhijklnopqrvwx
kalkinti/NTXcefl
kalto/NPXqu
kankino/PSXcdefjlnopqrvx
kapoja/ENSXabcdefijklruvwx
kapstyti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kargliojo/NPXl
kariavo/NPXbdefilnv
kas /NPSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrsvwx
kasioti/NTXadjkl
kasti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrsvwx
kaukia/ENXcdefgkl
kaulin jo/NPXd
kau ia/ENXcil
kekiuoja/ESX
k l /NPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
keliauja/ENSXabdefgijklv
kepti/NSTXacdefhijklpruvx
kerp ti/NTXak
kirdina/ESXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirdino/PSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirto/PSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
ki ti/NSTXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
klajojo/NPSXabdefgijklpqrtvx
klajoti/NSTXabdefgijklpqrtvx
klastyti/NSTXacdefhijklmpqruw
klasto/ENSXacdefhijklmpqruw
klaus /NPSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
klausin ja/ENSXadfhklmnpqrwx
klibus/ANQ
kli ti/NUXbcdfijlm
kloj jo/NPXdfnpt
kluso/NPXfk
kniubd /NXYk
ko iojo/NPXdk
kodavo/NPXbdhlntx
komunikuoti/NTXfijkrvw
kor /NPSXabcdefhjklmopqrvwx
kraikyti/NTXadfl
krap t /NPSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvx
krap tyti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvx
krap to/ENSXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvx
krauti/NSTXabcdefhjklmopqrtvwx
kryk tel ti/NTX
kruta/ENSXbcdefgijkloruv
k r /NPSXbcdefghijklnortuvwx
k renti/NSTXacdefijkmoprv
kurti/NSTXbcdefghijklnortuvwx
kutena/ENSXabdfijklmrvx
kv p /NPXcdjnpqvx
kviet /NPSXbcdefjklnopqrsvwx
laipioja/ENXadfkv
lai  /NPSXYabdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lakino/NPXdfgjkl
lamdo/ENSXadfijklmpuwx
la  jo/NPXacdejkl
laup /NPSXYabdeijmnp
lau  /NPSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lau o/ENSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lau ti/NSTXbcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
lesti/NTXadefiklq
leteno/NPXadek
lijo/NXYabcdefhijklopqrtv
lindo/NPXbcdefhijklowx
lipdyti/NTXabdejklqvx
litavo/NPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
lygiuoti/STXdfkpw
lyti/ENUXabcdefhijklopqrtv
luo ina/ENSXakw
maketuoja/ENXkqvw
mal /NPSXcdfhijkopruvw
mank tino/PSXijuv
marinuoja/ENXlx
matavo/NPSXabdfhjknprv
mato/ENSXacdefhjklqrtw
maukia/ESXbejklnqvwx
meilauti/NSTXv
melaginti/NTXd
mesti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
met /NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
mezgioja/ENXbjkl
miegojo/NPSXbdfhijlmnptvx
miltavo/NPX
mygti/NTXcdef
modernino/NPXk
monolitinis/BN
muisto/ENSXfkrw
mu a/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqruvwx
nar  /NXYdfkvx
ne  /NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
ne ioti/NSTXacdefhijklmnpqruvwx
niekinti/NTXdefk
ni ko/NPXak
nokino/NPXaefk
orientuoja/ENSXhtvw
pabesti/STX
papildin jo/NPX
pasimaivo/ENX
pasipa o/ESX
p r /PSXdefpqr
pilsto/ENXcdejkl
pinga/ENXbefk
pirko/NPSXabcdefhijklmnpqrvwx
pykdyti/NTXcfjkl
pjov /NPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
planuoja/ENSXdefhjklvwx
plauna/ENSXadefhijklmpqrtuvw
pl sti/STXdfipru
pl  ti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
ply ti/NTXabcdehikl
plojo/NPSXacdefijklovw
plukd /NSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
plukdyti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
pl koti/NTX
pl sta/ENSXabdfhijklmprtvw
prasidr ksti/STX
pra yti/STXcdfjklnoprtvwx
prekiauti/NTX
prisiverkia/ESX
pur kia/ENSXacdefjklmopqrvx
pust /NSXYbcdefjklpr
ragavo/NPSXdfjkntv
rai  /NSXYabcdfijklmopqruvwx
rasoti/NTXa
raug ti/NTXln
r kia/ENXadefhiklpx
r kina/ENX
reklamavo/NPSXdfhprtvx
rengin jo/NPXacdefhmopqt
rent /NPXcel
riboja/ENSXablmn
ridena/ESXbcdefghjklnopqrtvwx
rideno/PSXbcdefghjklnopqrtvwx
riejo/NPSXafjkvw
rikiavo/PSXdfhjkptvw
romantino/NPX
rop  ia/ESXnopqsvx
rop t /PSXnopqsvx
r dyti/NTXacdefhijkl
r gsta/ENXacdefhikln
r pinti/NSTXadfjkmprtuvwx
savina/ESXeor
seg /DNPSXabcdefjklnopqrvwx
serga/ENXadfhiknopqvx
s sti/STXacdefhjklnovwx
sisteminti/NTXk
si lyti/NSTXcfjorv
siuto/NPXabcfhlopv
skainioti/NTXadj
sk t /NPSXdilpu
skiria/ENSXbcdfhijnprtuv
skirti/NSTXbcdfhijnprtuv
skydo/NPXfik
skleid ia/ESXabdfhijklmnpruvwx
skleisti/STXabdfhijklmnpruvwx
sklembia/ENXbe
skrido/NPSXabcdefghijkl
slapstyti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
slinko/NPSXbcdefijklqrtvw
sli kinti/NTXbcdegi
sl gti/NTXbcek
smigo/NPXcefikl
smuktel jo/NPX
spardo/ENSXabdefklmqrvwx
spaudin ti/NTXabcdefjklmqrvwx
spausdina/ENSXbcdhjnoptv
stabdyti/NSTXafjklrw
statydina/ENSXabflmnrx
stoja/ENSXabcdefhjklmnoqrx
stovi/ENSXbdefhijnopqrtvwx
st m /NPSXbcdefghijklnopqrstuvwx
supa yti/STX
susipinkliojo/PSX
susiteplioti/STX
sverd ti/NTXfk
svetimavo/NPX
taiko/ENSXbcdefjklqrvw
tais /NPSXYabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
taiso/ENSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
tampo/ENSXabdefijklmpruvw
taria/ENSXabcdefhijklmpqrtuvwx
tarin ti/NTXabcdefhjlmrw
ta k /NXYj
taupyti/NTXfjkrvw
tau k /NPSXdfgijlopqruvx
teisinti/STXcdfopr
tekti/NTXabdfhijklp
telkti/STXfkrw
tikrina/ENSXadfhiklrtuvwx
tino/NPXadfkl
trank /NPSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
traukia/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqrvwx
tursenti/NTX
tvat ti/NTX
tverti/STXabcdefhklmnopqrtwx
urbinti/NTXd
u gobia/ESX
vaidyti/STXkw
vaip /EPSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
vairuoti/NTXbcdefgj
val /DNSXYadefikmpqruvw
valg /NSXYacdefhijklmnpqrtvw
valgyti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
vard iavosi/Pi
var /NSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
varginti/NSTXcdefhjklqrtv
vargti/NTXbcdefhijklv
varstyti/NSTXcdfhjklnpqtwx
vart /NSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
ved /NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrsvwx
vedin jo/NPXbcdefhjklnopqstvx
velia/ENSXacefjkmoqvw
v r /DNPSXbcdeghijklnopqtuvwx
verkti/NTXadefijlmnopqrtvx
vesdinti/NTXabk
v sino/NPSXbfhnrtu
ve a/ESXabcdefghijklnopqstvwx
v  lioja/ENXgk
vilioja/ENSXabcdefgjknopqrsvw
vilki/ENXdfik
vinguro/NPX
virbino/NPX
vir /NPSXabdefhijklpruvx
